California statutes. Financial Code
A “private trust” is every other trust, agency, fiduciary relationship, or representative capacity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1602.

A trust company, its officers and employees, shall not disclose any information to any person concerning the existence, condition, management, and administration of any private trust confided to it, except:

(a) Where such disclosure is specifically authorized by the terms of the trust.

(b) Where such disclosure is determined by an officer of the trust company
 to be necessary in the administration of such trust.

(c) Where such disclosure is required by a court of competent jurisdiction or by a subpoena issued by an attorney pursuant to Section 1985 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(d) Where such disclosure is made to, or upon the instructions of, any party executing the trust instrument.

(e) Where such disclosure refers to an irrevocable trust, to, or upon the instructions of, any beneficiary thereunder whether or not presently entitled to receive benefits therefrom.

(f) Where such disclosure is made to the commissioner in the course of an examination.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1603.

The commissioner shall examine the court trust business of a trust company at least once every 24 months and shall examine the private trust business at such times and to such extent as he or she may deem necessary or advisable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1604.

In making the reports to the commissioner required by this division, every trust company shall report, in addition to the other facts called for, separately, the amount of real property and the amount of personal property held by such trust company in both its court trusts and in its private trusts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1605.

Any court having jurisdiction of any executor, administrator, guardian, conservator, assignee, receiver, depositary, or trustee, upon the application of any such officer or trustee or upon the application of any person having an interest in the estate or property administered by such officer or trustee, after such notice to the other parties in interest as the court may direct, or without notice if all parties in interest consent thereto, and after a hearing upon such application, may
 authorize or direct such officer or trustee, whether such person has duly qualified or not, to deposit any moneys then in his hands or which may come into his hands thereafter, and such portion or all of the personal assets of such estate as the court shall deem proper for safekeeping, with any such trust company. Upon such deposit being made the court shall by an order of record reduce the bond to be given, or theretofore given, by such officer or trustee so as to cover only the estate remaining in the hands of such officer or trustee. The money and property so deposited shall thereupon and thereafter be held by such trust company under the order and direction of the court.

Such trust company shall not be required to give any bond or security, except as provided in this division, in case of any deposit of moneys or other personal assets with it under this section. Its responsibility for the safekeeping of personal assets so deposited with it shall be that of a
 bailee for hire.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1606.

Securities held by a trust company by direction of any court order issued pursuant to Section 1605 may be deposited in a securities depository, as defined in Section 30004, which is licensed under Section 30200 or exempted from licensing thereunder by Section 30005 or 30006.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1607.

Whenever an executor, administrator, guardian or conservator of estates, assignee, receiver, depositary, or trustee is required to qualify by taking and subscribing an oath or to make an affidavit, any trust company acting in any such capacity may satisfy such requirement by the oath or affidavit of its president, vice president, secretary, assistant secretary, manager, trust officer, or assistant trust officer. Any such trust company shall be liable for its failure to perform any of the
 duties required by law to be performed by an individual acting in like capacity and shall be subject to the same penalties for such failure as would be applicable to an individual.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1608.

Whenever any corporation desires to withdraw from and discontinue doing a trust business, it shall furnish to the commissioner satisfactory evidence of its release and discharge from all the obligations and trusts which it has assumed or which have been imposed on it by law. Thereupon the commissioner shall revoke his or her certificate of authority to do a trust business, and the State Treasurer shall return to it all of the securities deposited by it. Thereafter such corporation shall
 not be permitted to use and shall not use the word “trust” in its corporate name, or in connection with its business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1609.

The validity or legality of any act or proceeding done or taken by any trust company, relating to or in connection with the administration of its court and private trusts, shall not be affected or impaired by the neglect or failure of such trust company, or of any officer or employee thereof, to comply with any of the provisions of this division. All such acts and proceedings done or taken prior to the revocation of its certificate of authority to do a trust business by the commissioner,
 under the provisions of this division, or the revocation by any court or judge thereof of the appointment, order, or decree theretofore entered in such trust matter, shall be as valid and effective for all purposes as if any such neglect or failure had not occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1610.

Nothing in this chapter shall make it unlawful for any person or corporation to engage in the business of receiving and holding money in escrow or of acting as trustee under deeds of trust given solely for the purpose of securing obligations for the repayment of money other than corporate bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1611.

A bank or trust company shall not mingle trust funds received by it with other assets of the corporation or association and such funds shall not be used in the conduct of its business except to the extent that such funds are deposited with the same corporation or association in accordance with the provisions of this division. Any officer of any bank or association who knowingly violates or consents to the violation of this section is guilty of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1612.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any bank and any trust company holding securities in a fiduciary capacity or while engaged in a trust business, or while acting in any capacity under a court or private trust, or while acting in that capacity with one or more persons as cofiduciary or cofiduciaries, unless the instrument creating the trust contains a provision to the contrary, is authorized to deposit or arrange for the deposit of the securities in a securities depository, as
 defined in Section 30004, which is licensed under Section 30200 or exempted from licensing thereunder by Section 30005 or 30006. When securities are so deposited, they may be held in the custody of the securities depository in which they are deposited or in the custody of any other securities depository so licensed or exempted and in which the securities depository in which the securities were deposited maintains an account, or in the custody of any bank or trust company with authority to accept custody of the securities, that accepts custody of the securities on behalf of a securities depository. The securities may be held in the name of the nominee of the securities depository in which they are deposited, or in the name of the nominee of any other securities depository with which the securities depository in which they are deposited maintains an account. The custodian of securities so deposited may merge certificates representing securities of the same class of the same issuer and may hold those
 certificates in bulk with any other securities deposited in any securities depository by any person regardless of the ownership of the securities, and certificates of small denomination may be merged into one or more certificates of larger denomination. Any bank or trust company that deposits or arranges for the deposit of the securities in a securities depository shall maintain records that at all times show the ownership of the deposited securities. A bank or trust company depositing securities pursuant to this section shall be subject to such rules and regulations as in the case of state chartered institutions, the commissioner and, in the case of national banking associations, the Comptroller of the Currency may from time to time issue. This section shall apply to securities now held or hereafter held by a bank or trust company in the above designated capacities. A bank or trust company may, but shall not be required to, own capital stock of a securities depository in which it deposits securities
 pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1613.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any bank and any trust company holding securities in a fiduciary capacity or while engaged in a trust business, or while acting in any capacity under a court or private trust, or while acting in that capacity with one or more persons as cofiduciary or cofiduciaries, unless the instrument creating the trust contains a provision to the contrary, is authorized to deposit or arrange for the deposit with a federal reserve bank of any such securities
 the principal and interest of which the United States or any department, agency, or instrumentality thereof has agreed to pay, or has guaranteed payment, to be credited to one or more accounts on the books of the federal reserve bank in the name of the bank or trust company, to be designated fiduciary or safekeeping accounts, to which accounts other similar securities may be credited. Any bank or trust company that deposits or arranges for the deposit of securities pursuant to this section shall maintain records that at all times show the ownership of the securities deposited. A bank or trust company depositing securities pursuant to this section shall be subject to such rules and regulations as in the case of state-chartered institutions, the commissioner and, in the case of national banking associations, the Comptroller of the Currency, may from time to time issue. Ownership of, and other interests in, the securities credited to such account may be transferred by entries on the books of the federal reserve
 bank without physical delivery of any securities. A bank or trust company acting as custodian for a fiduciary shall, on demand by the fiduciary, certify in writing to the fiduciary the securities deposited by the bank or trust company pursuant to this section for the account of the fiduciary. A fiduciary shall, on demand by any party to its accounting, certify in writing to that party the securities deposited for its account as a fiduciary pursuant to this section. This section shall apply to all fiduciaries and custodians for fiduciaries, acting on the effective date of this section or who thereafter may act regardless of the state of the instrument or court order by which they are appointed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 17. Safe Deposit [1620. - 1651.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1620. - 1620.]

1620.

Notice to a bank operating a safety deposit department or to a company conducting a safety deposit business of an adverse claim (the person making the adverse claim being hereafter in this section called “adverse claimant”) to any personal property in a safe-deposit box maintained by a bank or company and rented to any person, or to any personal property held by the bank or company in safekeeping or storage for any person shall be disregarded, and the bank or company, notwithstanding such notice, shall permit access to the box to the person to whom it is rented or shall deliver the contents thereof to or on the order of the person or shall deliver the property held in storage or safekeeping to or on the order of the person for whom it is held, without any liability on
 the part of the bank or company; subject, however, to the exceptions provided in subdivisions (a) and (b) of this section:

(a) If an adverse claimant delivers to the bank at the office at which the safe-deposit box is maintained or the property is held his or her affidavit stating that of his or her own knowledge the person in whose name the box stands or for whom the property is held is a fiduciary for the adverse claimant and that he or she has reason to believe that fiduciary is about to misappropriate the contents of the box or the property, and stating the facts upon which the claim of fiduciary relationship and the belief are founded, the bank or company shall refuse access to the safe-deposit box or refuse to deliver the personal property for a period of not more than three court days (including the day of delivery) from the date that
 the bank or company received the adverse claimant’s affidavit, without liability on its part and without liability for the sufficiency or truth of the facts alleged in the affidavit.

(b) If at any time, either before, after, or in the absence of the filing of an affidavit by the adverse claimant, the adverse claimant procures and serves upon the bank or company at the office at which the safe-deposit box is maintained or the property is held a restraining order, injunction, or other appropriate order against the bank or company from a court of competent jurisdiction in an action in which the adverse claimant and all persons in whose names the box stands or for whom the property is held are parties, the bank or company shall comply with that order or injunction, without liability on its part.

(c) The provisions of this section shall be applicable even though the name of the person appearing on the bank’s or company’s books as the renter of the box or as the depositor of the property held in storage or safekeeping is modified by a qualifying or descriptive term such as “agent,” “trustee,” or other word or phrase indicating that the person may not be the owner in his or her own right of the contents of the box or of the property held in storage or safekeeping.

(d) Before giving access to any safe-deposit box, the bank or company may demand payment to it of all costs and expenses of opening the safe-deposit box and all costs and expenses of repairing any damage to the safe-deposit box caused by the opening thereof.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), if a
 central location has been designated by the bank pursuant Section 684.115 of the Code of Civil Procedure for service of legal process, as that term is defined in Section 684.110 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the adverse claimant shall serve a notice of adverse claim or related affidavit, order, injunction, or other order contemplated herein at the central location. If a central location has not but should have been designated by the bank pursuant Section 684.115 of the Code of Civil Procedure for service of legal process, as that term is defined in Section 684.110 of the Code of Civil Procedure, the adverse claimant may serve a notice of adverse claim or related affidavit, order, injunction, or other order contemplated herein at any branch or office of the institution located in
 this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 484, Sec. 14.   (AB 2364)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Remedies for Nonpayment of Rent [1630. - 1651.]

1630.

Every bank conducting a safe-deposit business shall be entitled to the special remedies set forth in this article in enforcing the liabilities of safe-deposit box renters and of safekeeping and storage depositors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1631.

If the rental of any safe-deposit box is not paid within six months from the day it is due, the bank, or at any time thereafter and while such rental remains unpaid, may mail a notice to the person in whose name such box stands on its records stating that if the amount due for such rental is not paid on or before a specified day, which must be at least 30 days after the date of mailing such notice, the bank will cause such box to be forced open.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1632.

At any time after the date specified in such notice, if the rental for such safe-deposit box to the date of payment and the cost of giving such notice have not been paid, the bank, in the presence of two of its employees, one of whom shall be an officer of the bank, may cause such box to be opened and the contents thereof to be removed and inventoried. The inventory shall be signed by such persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1633.

The following persons, and no others, are entitled to receive from the bank a copy of the inventory:

(a) An executor of the decedent’s will.

(b) The administrator of the decedent’s estate.

(c) The attorney for the executor or administrator.

(d) A tenant of the safe-deposit box.

(e) Any heir of the decedent or beneficiary under the decedent’s will.

(f) Any person whom the superior court having jurisdiction by order directs should be allowed to obtain a copy of the inventory.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1634.

All contents removed from a safe-deposit box pursuant to Section 1632 shall be retained by the bank for at least two years unless sooner delivered to or on the order of the person in whose name such box stood on the records of the bank. The bank shall deliver the contents of such box to or on the order of the person in whose name such box stood on its records, upon payment to it before such contents are sold or destroyed, of all rental due at the time of opening the box, the cost of
 giving notice, the charges for opening the box and for custody of the contents, and any other proper charges. The bank may deliver such contents on the order of the person in whose name such box stood on its records, irrespective of any information disclosed by the contents indicating ownership thereof by any other person.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1635.

At any time after two years from the day when a safe-deposit box has been opened pursuant to this article, the bank may mail a notice to the person in whose name such box stood on its records, stating that unless the amounts due to the bank for rental, for the cost of mailing and publishing notice of sale, and for its charges for opening the box and for custody of its contents, and any other proper charges, giving the total amount thereof, are paid, the bank will offer for sale the
 contents thereof at a time and place named in such notice, which time shall be at least 30 days after the mailing thereof. If the amounts specified in such notice are not paid before the time of sale designated therein, the bank may sell all or any portion of the contents of such box, other than contents of the character described in Section 1668 and other than bonds and other securities which at the time of sale are listed on an established stock exchange in the United States, at public sale at the time and place given in such notice. Notice of the time and place of sale shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the sale is to be held once at least five days before the date of sale, or if no such newspaper is published in the county such notice shall be posted in three public places in the county at least five days before the date of sale. Such notice need describe the property only in general terms and as the unclaimed contents of a safe-deposit box. Such sale may be
 postponed from time to time by public pronouncement at the time and place of sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1636.

Notwithstanding any of the provisions of this article, no stocks, bonds, or other securities which, at the time of sale pursuant to Section 1635, are listed on any established stock exchange in the United States may be sold at public sale but may be sold at any time thereafter through an established stock exchange.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1637.

Upon the making of a sale of any securities, an officer of the bank shall execute and attach to the securities so sold an affidavit reciting facts showing that such securities were sold pursuant to this article and that the provisions of this article governing such sale have been complied with. The affidavit shall be and constitute sufficient authority to any corporation whose stock is so sold or to any registrar or transfer agent of such corporation to cancel the certificates of stock
 so sold and to issue a new certificate or certificates representing such stock to the purchaser thereof, and to any registrar, trustee, or transfer agent of registered bonds or other securities, to register any such bonds or other securities in the name of the purchaser thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1638.

From the proceeds of any sale the bank shall deduct the amount set forth in such notice and any further charges which may have accrued since the mailing of the notice and shall record the balance of the proceeds, if any, on its books as a liability payable to the person in whose name the safe-deposit box was rented.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1639.

Any documents, letters, or other articles found in a safe-deposit box opened pursuant to Section 1632, which in the judgment of at least two officers of the bank have no intrinsic or marketable value, need not be offered for sale. Any documents, letters, and articles and any other contents which have been offered for sale and for which no purchaser has been found, shall be retained by the bank for not less than one year from the date when the box was opened. At any time thereafter,
 unless sooner delivered to or on the order of the person in whose name the box stood on the records of the bank, the documents, letters, and articles and also those contents which have been offered for sale and for which no purchaser has been found, may be destroyed in the presence of an officer of the bank, but if no notice of intended sale of the contents of the box has been given pursuant to Section 1635, the bank shall mail a notice of its intention to destroy the documents, letters, and articles at least 30 days before the destruction of the same to the person in whose name the box stood on the records of the bank.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1640.

If, before the effective date of this section, a bank or its predecessor in interest, has caused a safe-deposit box to be opened for nonpayment of rental, and the contents of such box or any part thereof remain in its custody, it shall be entitled to the special remedies in enforcing the liability of the former renter of such box as set forth in Sections 1634 to 1639, inclusive, whether or not such box was rented prior to October 1, 1949.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1641.

Whenever a bank receives personal property for safekeeping or storage as bailee and issues a receipt therefor, the bank may enforce its lien as warehouseman in accordance with the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code or at its option in the manner provided in Sections 1671 to 1673, inclusive, of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1642.

If the amount charged by a bank for the safekeeping or storage of personal property is not paid within six months from the day it is due, the bank, at any time thereafter and while such charges remain unpaid, may mail a notice to the person in whose name the receipt was issued, giving the amount then due for such safekeeping or storage and stating that unless such amount and any other charges accruing to the date of payment are paid, the bank will sell such personal property at a time
 and place named therein, which time shall be at least 30 days after the mailing of such notice. If the amount specified in such notice and all other charges of the bank and expenses of mailing and publishing notice of sale accruing to time of payment are not paid, the bank may sell all or any portion of such personal property at public sale at the time and place given in such notice. Notice of the time and place of sale shall be published once at least five days before the date of sale in a newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the sale is to be held, or if no such newspaper is published in the county such notice shall be posted in three public places in the county at least five days before the date of sale. Such sale may be postponed from time to time by public pronouncement at the time and place of sale. The bank may include in the notice required to be mailed a statement to the effect that if the amount due at that time is not paid at least 10 days before the date set for the
 sale, it may cause any container in which any of such personal property may be, to be opened and the contents thereof to be sold at the time and place fixed for the sale with or without such container, or the container may be sold without the contents. If such statement is included in the notice, the bank, at any time within 10 days before the date fixed for the sale, may open any such container and remove the contents in the presence of two employees of the bank, one of whom shall be an officer thereof, both of whom shall make and sign an inventory of the contents. Thereafter, on the day fixed for the sale, the contents may be sold as a whole or separately and with or without the container, or the container may be sold without the contents.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1643.

From the proceeds of the sale, the bank shall deduct all charges as stated in the final notice, together with any further charges that have accrued since the mailing thereof, and reasonable expenses for notices, advertising, and sale, and shall credit the balance of the proceeds, if any, to an account in the name of the person in whose name the receipt for such personal property was issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1644.

Any documents, letters, or other articles which, in the judgment of an officer of the bank, have no apparent intrinsic or marketable value, need not be offered for sale. The documents, letters, and articles and any other articles which have been offered for sale and for which no purchaser has been found, shall be retained by the bank for not less than one year from the date when notice of sale was mailed. At any time thereafter, unless sooner delivered to or on the order of the person in
 whose name the receipt was issued, the documents, letters and articles may be destroyed in the presence of an officer of the bank and of a notary public.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1645.

The power conferred on a bank to sell the contents of a safe-deposit box or personal property received for safekeeping or storage for nonpayment of rental or other charges, includes power to sell any bonds, stock certificates, promissory notes, choses in action, or other securities, and any other tangible or intangible property found in such box or in the container in which such personal property was received for safekeeping or storage, regardless of whether it appears from such
 securities or property that the person in whose name the box stood or to whom the safekeeping or storage receipt was issued, possesses title to any interest in such securities or other property or power to transfer such title or interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1646.

A bank holding a safe-deposit box originally rented from, or personal property against which a safekeeping or storage receipt was issued by, a predecessor in interest, or a bank holding the contents of such box, shall be entitled to the remedies as to such box or the contents thereof or as to the safekeeping or storage of such property in like manner and to the same extent as if such box had been rented from or such safekeeping or storage of personal property had been received by such
 bank in the first instance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1647.

The provisions of this article do not preclude any other remedy by action or otherwise now or hereafter existing for the enforcement of the claims of a bank against the person in whose name the safe-deposit box stood or stands, or in whose name the safekeeping or storage receipt was issued, nor bar the right of a bank to so recover, at its option, either the entire amount of the debt due to it without recourse to sale of the property, if any, or so much of the debt due to it as shall not
 have been paid by the proceeds of the sale of all or any portion of the property deposited with it.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1648.

If the principal of, or interest or dividends on, any securities that have come into the possession of any bank by reason of action taken pursuant to this article, is due and payable at the time such securities come into the bank’s possession, or thereafter while such securities remain in the possession of the bank, shall become due and payable, the bank at its election may collect such principal, interest, or dividends and from the proceeds thereof may deduct all sums then due to it
 from the person to whom such safe-deposit box was rented or to whom such safekeeping or storage receipt was issued. The remainder of the money so collected, if any, shall be credited by the bank to the account of the delinquent boxholder or of the person in whose name the safekeeping or storage receipt was issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1649.

(a) Whenever this article requires that notice be sent to a person, and the box stood or stands on the records of the bank or the safekeeping or storage receipt was issued in the names of two or more persons, notice addressed to either or to any one of the two or more persons shall be binding upon and effective as to the remaining person or all remaining persons, and notice addressed to the name of any deceased individual shall be binding upon his or her legal
 representatives and on his or her heirs and legatees.

(b) Whenever this article requires that notice be published prior to a sale, the notice shall include the name and address of the person in whose name the safe-deposit box stood on the records of the bank or the safekeeping or storage receipt was issued. The names and addresses of all persons whose property is to be sold at the same time and place may be included in a single published notice.

(c) Whenever this article requires that an amount be credited to the account of a person in whose name a safe-deposit box stood on the records of the bank or a safekeeping or storage receipt was issued, and the box stood or the receipt was issued in two or more names, the account shall be in both or all the names, subject to withdrawal by or upon the written order of any one or more of those persons, or by their successors or legal
 representatives.

(d) Whenever this article requires that a notice shall be mailed to the person in whose name the safe-deposit box stood on the records of the bank or a safekeeping or storage receipt was issued, the notice shall be deemed to have been so mailed if it is enclosed in a sealed envelope addressed to the person in whose name the safe-deposit box stood in the office of the bank at which the records of the safe-deposit box rentals are kept, or to the person in whose name the receipt was issued, as the case may be, addressed to the person at the address or place appearing on the safe-deposit or storage records of the office, and the envelope with postage prepaid has been deposited by at least first-class mail in the United States mail.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1650.

Whenever an amount of safe-deposit rental, custody, safekeeping, or other charge is to be paid or deducted pursuant to this article, there shall be added to and paid or deducted with said amount, the amount of any tax imposed by laws and regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1651.

Any bank or trust company may receive bonds issued by the United States Government for safekeeping, collection, or storage, and shall receipt therefor to the depositor and shall maintain adequate records of all transactions therewith. In every case of such deposit the depositary bank shall have the right to return to the depositor either the identical bonds deposited by him or other bonds of the same issue, par value, and character.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 18. Interstate Acquisitions [1660. - 1664.]

1660.

This chapter does not apply to any of the following transactions:

(a) An acquisition of control of a California state bank that requires the approval of the commissioner under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 1250).

(b) A sale or merger that requires the approval of the commissioner under Division 1.6 (commencing with Section 4800).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1661.

Each application filed with the commissioner for an approval under this chapter shall be in the form, shall contain the information, shall be signed in the manner, and shall, if the commissioner requires by regulation or order, be verified in the manner that the commissioner may by regulation or order require.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1662.

The fee for filing with the commissioner an application for an approval under this chapter is two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1663.

(a) The definitions that are set forth in or are applicable to Section 3(d) of the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1842(d)) apply to this section.

(b) The commissioner may approve an acquisition by a bank holding company that is subject to Section 3(d)(2)(B) and (D)(ii) of the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956 (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1842(d)(2)(B) and (D)(ii)) if the commissioner finds that the
 acquisition is consistent with the public convenience and advantage in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

1664.

(a) The definitions that are set forth in or are applicable to Section 44 of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1831u) apply to this section.

(b) This section does not apply if each bank involved in an interstate merger transaction (including each insured depository institution that is an affiliate of the surviving, resulting, or purchasing bank) that is organized under the laws of this
 state or that maintains a branch office in this state, is an industrial loan company (as defined in Section 4805.10).

(c) The commissioner may approve an interstate merger transaction that is subject to Section 44(b)(2)(B) and (D)(ii) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1831u(b)(2)(B) and (D)(ii)) if the commissioner finds that the transaction is consistent with the public convenience and advantage in this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 243, Sec. 3.   (SB 664)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 19. Foreign (Other State) Banks [1670. - 1721.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [1670. - 1676.]

1670.

In this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

(a) “Branch business unit” has the meaning set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 4840.

(b) “Core banking business” means the business of receiving deposits, paying checks, making loans, and other activities that the commissioner may specify by order or regulation. “Core banking business,” when used to
 describe the trust business, includes receiving fiduciary assets and administering fiduciary accounts.

(c) “Facility,” when used with respect to a foreign (other state) bank, means an office in this state at which the bank engages in noncore banking business but at which it does not engage in core banking business.
